Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2271.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3121(e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3121. Rape.* * *(e) Sentences.--[Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1103 (relating to sentence of imprisonment for felony), a person convicted of an offense under:(1) Subsection (c) shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.(2) Subsection (d) shall be sentenced up to a maximum term of life imprisonment.] Notwithstanding any other 123456789101112131415161718 provision of law:(1) A person convicted of an offense under s ubsection (c):(i) Shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.(ii) M ay be sentenced to undergo m edroxyprogesterone acetate treatment in accordance with a schedule of administration monitored by the department. A s an alternative to medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment, the person may voluntarily elect to undergo surgical castration.(2) A person convicted of an offense under subsection (d):(i) Shall be sentenced up to a maximum term of life imprisonment.(ii) M ay be sentenced to undergo medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment in accordance with a schedule of administration monitored by the department. As an alternative to medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment, the person may voluntarily elect to undergo surgical castration.(f) Administration of treatment.--If a person is sentenced to a period of incarceration under this section and the court orders the person to undergo medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment, the department shall commence administration of the treatment not later than one week prior to the person's release from incarceration.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless 20260HB2271PN2971 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth."Surgical castration." The permanent, surgical removal of an individual's testicles (orchiectomy) or ovaries (oophorectomy) to prevent the production of sex hormones.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2271PN2971 - 3 - 1234567